Missouri, session 2026, HB2939.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 226, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 226.036, to read as follows:
226.036. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all planned
expenditures included in the statewide transportation improvement program (STIP)
shall specify the county in which each project is to be performed and include itemized
expenditures and expenses for each project.
2. After any project included in the STIP is completed, the department of
transportation shall submit an itemized expenditure report to each county with a
project located within its jurisdiction.
3. No later than January 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, the department of
transportation shall make a report to the general assembly detailing the department's
expenditures for projects in the STIP, which shall include an itemization of such
expenditures organized by county.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.